Hawaii statutes.
§832-7 Issue of governor's warrant of
arrest; its recitals. If the governor decides that the demand should be
complied with, the governor shall sign a warrant of arrest, which shall be
sealed with the great seal of the State, and be directed to any peace officer
or other person whom the governor may think fit to entrust with the execution
thereof. The warrant must substantially recite the facts necessary to the
validity of its issuance. [L 1941, c 99, §7; RL 1945, §10637; RL 1955, §250-7;
HRS §713-7; ren L 1972, c 9, pt of §1; gen ch 1985]

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next